Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4112
Mandated providers; opportunity to bid, contract, provide services.

Mandated types of providers whose services are required to be made available to insureds pursuant to section 44-513 shall, to the extent required by such section, have the same opportunity to bid and negotiate contracts for health services as a preferred provider or to provide health services as a nonpreferred provider.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 12.